Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
Interpreters For the Deaf

§ 13-1-301.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 13-1-301 through 13-1-315 the following terms shall have the definition ascribed to them herein unless the context requires otherwise:

“Deaf person” means any person whose hearing is totally impaired or whose hearing is so seriously impaired as to prohibit the person from understanding oral communications when spoken to in a normal conversational tone. The term further includes, but is not limited to, a person who is mute and a person who is both deaf and mute.

“Qualified interpreter” means an interpreter certified by the national registry of interpreters for the deaf, Mississippi Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf or, in the event a qualified interpreter so certified is not available, an interpreter whose qualifications are otherwise determined. Efforts to obtain the services of a qualified interpreter qualified with a legal skills certificate or a comprehensive skills certificate will be made prior to accepting services of an interpreter with lesser certification. No qualified interpreter may be appointed unless the appointing authority and the deaf person make a preliminary determination that the interpreter is able to interpret accurately the statements of the deaf person and interpret the proceedings in which a deaf person may be involved.

“Oral interpreter” means a person who interprets language through facial and lip movements only and who does not use manual communication. An oral interpreter shall be provided upon the request of a deaf person who does not communicate in sign language. The right of a deaf person to have an interpreter may not be waived except by a deaf person who does not use sign language and who initiates such request for waiver in writing. Such waiver is subject to approval of counsel of such deaf person, if existent, and is subject to approval of the appointing authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-1-303.
Appointment of interpreter; court proceedings; policy custody; statements of deaf person as evidence.

In any case in law or equity before any court or the grand jury, wherein any deaf person is a party to such action, either as a defendant or witness, the court shall appoint a qualified interpreter of the deaf sign language to interpret the proceedings to the deaf person and interpret his testimony or statements and to assist in preparation with counsel.

Whenever any deaf person is a party in interest, either as a defendant or witness at a proceeding before any department, board, commission, agency or licensing authority of the state or any political subdivision of the state, the department, board, commissioner, agency or licensing authority conducting the proceedings shall appoint a qualified interpreter of the deaf sign language to interpret the proceedings to the deaf person and to interpret any testimony he may give.

In the event that a deaf person has been detained in police custody or has been arrested for any alleged violation of a criminal law, a qualified interpreter or, upon request, an oral interpreter shall be provided by the arresting officer and his superiors prior to any interrogation or taking of a statement from the person.

In the event any interrogation statements in writing are made to the arresting officer by the deaf person with the qualified interpreter present, such interrogation and answers thereto shall be preserved and turned over to the court in the event such person is tried for the alleged offense.

Any statement made by a deaf person to a law enforcement officer may be used as evidence against that person only if the statement was made, offered or elicited in the presence of a qualified interpreter of the deaf sign language. No statements taken from such deaf person prior to the presence of a qualified interpreter may be admissible in court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-1-305.
Hearing to determine need for interpreter; notification of need.

If the judge, or any other person charged under the provisions of Sections 13-1-301 through 13-1-315 with providing an interpreter, believes that a person claiming to be entitled to an interpreter may not actually be deaf or hearing impaired, unable to communicate verbally because of his hearing disability, or otherwise not entitled to such services, the judge may, on good cause shown, hold a hearing to determine the extent of the person’s handicap or disability and the bona fide need for interpreting services. If it is determined that the person is not entitled to such services, an interpreter shall not be provided. Except in a preliminary hearing in a criminal case, every deaf person whose appearance before a proceeding entitles him to an interpreter shall notify the appointing authority of his disability not less than five (5) days prior to any appearance and shall request at such time the services of an interpreter. When a deaf person reasonably expects to need an interpreter for more than a single day, he shall so notify the appointing authority, and such notification shall be sufficient for the duration of his participation in the proceedings. When a deaf person receives notification of an appearance less than five (5) days before such appearance, he shall provide his notification and request for an interpreter as soon thereafter as practicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-1-307.
Duties of interpreter.

The duties of the interpreter may include:

Interpreting during court and court-related proceedings, including any and all meetings and conferences between client and his attorney;

Translating or interpreting documents;

Assisting in taking depositions;

Assisting in administering oaths; and

Such other duties as may be required by the judge of the court making the appointment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-1-309.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

[En Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 5]

§ 13-1-311.
List of qualified interpreters.

It shall be the responsibility of the appointing authority to channel requests for qualified interpreters through (a) the Mississippi Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf; (b) the community services program at the Mississippi School for the Deaf, or, (c) any community resource wherein the appointing authority or the deaf person is knowledgeable that such qualified interpreters can be found. It shall be the responsibility of the community services program at the Mississippi School for the Deaf to compile and update annually a listing of qualified interpreters and to make this listing available to authorities in possible need of interpreter services as provided in Sections 13-1-301 through 13-1-315.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-1-313.
Affirmation of true interpretation.

Before participating in any proceedings subsequent to an appointment under the provisions of Sections 13-1-301 through 13-1-315, an interpreter shall make an oath or affirmation that he will make a true interpretation in an understandable manner to the person for whom he is appointed and that he will repeat the statements of such persons in the English language to the best of his skill and judgment. The appointing authority shall provide recess periods as necessary for the interpreter when the interpreter so indicates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-1-315.
Fees for interpreters.

An interpreter appointed under the provisions of Sections 13-1-301 through 13-1-315 shall be entitled to a reasonable fee for such services in addition to actual expenses for travel and transportation. The court or appointing authority may consider standards established by the Mississippi Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf in determining a reasonable fee. When the interpreter is appointed by a court in a criminal case the fee shall be paid out of the general fund of the state, county or municipality, as the case may be. An interpreter’s fee in a civil action shall be paid out of funds provided by law or by one or more of the parties as the court may direct and may be taxed ultimately as costs in the discretion of the court. When an interpreter is provided by an appointing authority pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 13-1-303, the fee shall be paid out of funds available to the appointing authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 414, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1984.